fr: Entreprise et industrie > Équipement de protection > Longes de sécurité: Longes de sécurité à ancrage; Longes de sécurité à ceinture à outils; Longes de sécurité pour poignet
pl: Biznes i przemysł > Środki ochrony osobistej > Uwięzie zabezpieczające: Uwięzie zabezpieczające z zakotwiczeniem; Uwięzie zabezpieczające z pasem narzędziowym; Uwięzie zabezpieczające na nadgarstek
el: Επιχειρηματικός & βιομηχανικός εξοπλισμός > Προστατευτικός εξοπλισμός εργασίας > Πρόσδεση ασφαλείας εργασίας: Πρόσδεση ασφαλείας εργασίας αγκύρωσης; Πρόσδεση ασφαλείας εργασίας για ζώνες εργαλείων; Πρόσδεση ασφαλείας εργασίας καρπού
hr-HR: Posao i industrija > Zaštitna oprema za rad > Sigurnosne uzice za rad: Sigurnosne uzice za rad na sidrištima; Sigurnosne uzice za pojas za alat; Sigurnosne uzice za rad za zapešće
de: Wirtschaft & Industrie > Arbeitsschutzausrüstung > Halteseile: Verankerungshalteseile; Werkzeuggürtelhalteseile; Handgelenkhalteseile
es: Economía e industria > Equipo de protección para el trabajo > Anclajes de seguridad laboral: Correas de seguridad laboral de anclaje; Correas de seguridad laboral con cinturón de herramientas; Correas de seguridad laboral para muñeca
en: Business & Industrial > Work Safety Protective Gear > Work Safety Tethers: Anchorage Work Safety Tethers; Tool Belt Work Safety Tethers; Wrist Work Safety Tethers
ru: Бизнес и промышленность > Защитная экипировка для безопасного выполнения работ > Страховочные тросы: Страховочные тросы для анкерного крепления; Страховочные тросы для пояса с инструментами; Страховочные тросы на запястье
ko: 비즈니스/산업 > 작업용 안전 보호 장치 > 작업용 안전줄: 앵커식 작업용 안전줄; 공구벨트 착용식 작업용 안전줄; 손목 착용식 작업용 안전줄
zh-TW: 商業與各產業 > 工作安全防護裝備 > 工作安全繩: 錨錠工作安全繩; 工具防墜工作安全繩; 工作安全腕帶
cs: Obchod a průmysl > Ochranné pomůcky > Jisticí lana: Pracovní bezpečnostní úvazky s kotvicími body; Upínací opasky na nářadí; Upínací náramky a popruhy na zápěstí
bg-BG: Бизнес и промишленост > Защитна екипировка за безопасност при работа > Предпазни въжета: Анкерни предпазни въжета; Работни предпазни въжета за колан за инструменти; Работни предпазни въжета за китката
ja: ビジネス・産業 > 安全保護用品 > 命綱: 固定アンカー付き命綱; ツールベルト付き命綱; 手首命綱
pt-PT: Business e industrial > Equipamento de proteção de segurança no trabalho > Cordas de segurança no trabalho: Cordas de segurança no trabalho de ancoragem; Cordas de segurança no trabalho no cinto de ferramentas; Cordas de segurança no trabalho no pulso
sv: Företag och industri > Arbetsskyddskläder > Säkerhetslinor: Förankring för arbetssäkerhetsrem; Verktygsbälte arbetssäkerhetsrem; Handledssäkerhetsrem
fi: Yritys ja teollisuus > Työturvallisuusvälineet > Putoamissuojaimet: Ankkurityyppiset putoamissuojaimet; Työkaluvyön putoamissuojaimet; Ranneputoamissuojaimet
vi: Kinh doanh & Công nghiệp > Bộ đồ bảo hộ lao động > Dây đai an toàn lao động: Dây đai an toàn lao động có móc neo; Dây đai an toàn lao động đeo dụng cụ; Dây đai an toàn lao động đeo cổ tay
sl-SI: Posel in industrija > Varnostna zaščitna oprema za delo > Varovalne delovne zanke: Varovalne sidriščne delovne zanke; Varovalne delovne zanke s pasom za orodje; Varovalne delovne zanke za zapestje
th: ธุรกิจและอุตสาหกรรม > อุปกรณ์ป้องกันสำหรับความปลอดภัยในการทำงาน > เชือกล่ามเพื่อความปลอดภัย: จุดยึดเชือกล่ามเพื่อความปลอดภัย; เข็มขัดเพื่อความปลอดภัย; สายรัดข้อมือเพื่อความปลอดภัย
ro-RO: Afaceri și sectorul industrial > Echipament de protecție pentru siguranța muncii > Coardă de siguranță la locul de muncă: Coardă de siguranță pentru ancorare; Coardă de siguranță pentru unelte de lucru; Coardă de siguranță pentru unelte cu prindere de încheietura mâinii
zh-CN: 商业/工业 > 劳保/防护用品 > 工作安全绳: 系牢点工作安全系绳; 工具腰带工作安全绳; 手腕工作安全绳
da: Erhverv og industri > Sikkerhedstøj > Sikkerhedsfastgøring: Sikkerhedsfastgøring – Forankring; Sikkerhedsfastgøring – Værktøjsbælte; Sikkerhedsfastgøring – Håndled
nb: Forretninger og industri > Beskyttelsesutstyr for jobbsikkerhet > Sikkerhetsfester for arbeidsplassen: Sikkerhetsfester for forankring; Sikkerhetsfester for verktøybelter; Sikkerhetsfester for håndledd
it: Commercio e industria > Attrezzature protettive > Cinghie per la sicurezza sul lavoro: Cinghie di ancoraggio per la sicurezza sul lavoro; Cinghie di sicurezza sul lavoro per cintura degli attrezzi; Cinghie di sicurezza sul lavoro da polso
lt-LT: Verslas ir pramonė > Darbo saugos priemonės > Dirželiai įrankiams: Inkaravimo dirželiai įrankiams; Prie įrankių diržo tvirtinami dirželiai įrankiams; Ant riešo tvirtinami dirželiai įrankiams
sk-SK: Obchod a priemysel > Pracovné ochranné prostriedky > Pracovné bezpečnostné popruhy: Pracovné bezpečnostné popruhy s kotevným závesom; Pracovné bezpečnostné popruhy s opaskom na náradie; Pracovné bezpečnostné popruhy na zápästie
tr: İş ve Endüstri > İş Güvenliği Koruyucu Kıyafetleri > Emniyet İpleri: Ankraj Emniyet İpleri; Alet Kemeri Emniyet İpleri; Bilek Emniyet İpleri
hu: Üzlet és ipar > Munkavédelmi védőfelszerelés > Munkabiztonsági kötelek: Rögzítéses munkabiztonsági kötelek; Szerszámszíjas munkabiztonsági kötelek; Csuklós munkabiztonsági kötelek
nl: Zakelijk en industrieel > Beschermende kleding > Veiligheidslijnen voor het werk: Verankeringsveiligheidslijnen voor het werk; Gereedschapsriemveiligheidslijnen voor het werk; Polsveiligheidslijnen voor het werk
pt-BR: Comercial e industrial > Equipamento de proteção > Correias de segurança: Correias de segurança para ancoragem; Correias de segurança para cintos de ferramentas; Correias de segurança para trabalho no pulso